Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-319.01
Class action litigation; unpaid
residue; payment by defendant.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that the
unpaid residuals in class action litigation are distributed, to the extent
possible, in a manner designed to promote justice for all citizens of this
state. The Legislature finds that the use of funds collected by state courts
pursuant to this section for these purposes is in the public interest, is
a proper use of the funds, and is consistent with essential public and governmental
purposes.

(2) Prior to the entry of
any judgment or order approving settlement in a class action described in
section 25-319, the court shall determine the total amount that will be payable
to all class members if all class members are paid the amount to which they
are entitled pursuant to the judgment or settlement. The court shall also
set a date when the parties shall report to the court the total amount that
was actually paid to the class members. After the report is received, the
court, unless it orders otherwise to further the purposes of the underlying
cause of action, shall direct the defendant to pay the sum of the unpaid residue
to the Legal Aid and Services Fund.

Laws 2014, LB1089, § 1.